Maryland, session 2025, SB0357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–2C–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Biologic” means a drug that is produced or distributed in accordance with a
biologics license application approved under 42 C.F.R. § 447.502.
(c) “Biosimilar” means a drug that is produced or distributed in accordance with
a biologics license application approved under 42 U.S.C. § 262(k)(3).
(d) “Board” means the Prescription Drug Affordability Board.

SENATE BILL 357 3
(e) (1) “Brand name drug” means a drug that is produced or distributed in
accordance with an original new drug application approved under 21 U.S.C. § 355(c).
(2) “Brand name drug” does not include an authorized generic as defined
by 42 C.F.R. § 447.502.
(F) “CURRENT SHORTAGE” MEANS A DRUG:
(1) LISTED AS CURRENT ON THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION’S DRUG SHORTAGE DATABASE; OR
(2) OTHERWISE DETERMINED BY THE BOARD TO BE IN SHORT
SUPPLY IN THE STATE.
[(f)] (G) “Generic drug” means:
(1) A retail drug that is marketed or distributed in accordance with an
abbreviated new drug application, approved under 21 U.S.C. § 355(j);
(2) An authorized generic as defined by 42 C.F.R. § 447.502; or
(3) A drug that entered the market before 1962 that was not originally
marketed under a new drug application.
[(g)] (H) “Manufacturer” means an entity that:
(1) (i) Engages in the manufacture of a prescription drug product; or
(ii) Enters into a lease with another manufacturer to market and
distribute a prescription drug product under the entity’s own name; and
(2) Sets or changes the wholesale acquisition cost of the prescription drug
product it manufactures or markets.
[(h)] (I) “Prescription drug product” means a brand name drug, a generic drug,
a biologic, or a biosimilar.
[(i)] (J) “Stakeholder Council” means the Prescription Drug Affordability
Stakeholder Council.
21–2C–04.
(a) There is a Prescription Drug Affordability Stakeholder Council.

SENATE BILL 357
(b) The purpose of the Stakeholder Council is to provide stakeholder input to
assist the Board in making decisions as required under this subtitle.
(c) (1) The Stakeholder Council consists of [26] members appointed in
accordance with this subsection.
(2) The Speaker of the House of Delegates shall appoint:
(i) One representative of generic drug corporations;
(ii) One representative of nonprofit insurance carriers;
(iii) One representative of a statewide health care advocacy coalition;
(iv) One representative of a statewide advocacy organization for
seniors;
(v) One representative of a statewide organization for diverse
communities;
(vi) One representative of a labor union;
(vii) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE RARE DISEASE COMMUNITY;
(VIII) One health services researcher specializing in prescription
drugs; and
[(viii)] (IX) One public member at the discretion of the Speaker of the
House of Delegates.
(3) The President of the Senate shall appoint:
(i) One representative of brand name drug corporations;
(ii) One representative of physicians;
(iii) One representative of nurses;
(iv) One representative of hospitals;
(v) One representative of dentists;
(vi) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF ONCOLOGISTS;
(VII) One representative of managed care organizations;

SENATE BILL 357 5
[(vii)] (VIII) One representative of the Department of Budget and
Management;
[(viii)] (IX) One clinical researcher; and
[(ix)] (X) One public member at the discretion of the President of
the Senate.
(4) The Governor shall appoint:
(i) One representative of brand name drug corporations;
(ii) One representative of generic drug corporations;
(iii) One representative of biotechnology companies;
(iv) One representative of for–profit health insurance carriers;
(v) One representative of employers;
(vi) One representative of pharmacy benefits managers;
(vii) One representative of pharmacists;
(viii) One pharmacologist; [and]
(ix) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A PATIENT ADVOCACY
ORGANIZATION; AND
(X) One public member at the discretion of the Governor.
(5) Collectively, the members of the Stakeholder Council shall have
knowledge of the following:
(i) The pharmaceutical business model;
(ii) Supply chain business models;
(iii) The practice of medicine or clinical training;
(iv) Consumer or patient perspectives;
(v) Health care costs trends and drivers;
(vi) Clinical and health services research; or

SENATE BILL 357
(vii) The State’s health care marketplace.
(6) To the extent practicable and consistent with federal and State law, the
membership of the Stakeholder Council shall reflect the racial, ethnic, and gender diversity
of the State.
(7) From among the membership of the Stakeholder Council, the Board
chair shall appoint two members to be cochairs of the Stakeholder Council.
(d) (1) The term of a member is 3 years.
(2) The initial members of the Stakeholder Council shall serve staggered
terms as required by the terms provided for members on October 1, 2019.
(e) A member of the Stakeholder Council:
(1) May not receive compensation as a member of the Stakeholder Council;
but
(2) Is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
21–2C–09.
(c) On or before December 31, 2020, and each December 31 thereafter, the Board
shall submit to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and Government
Operations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, a
report that includes:
(1) Price trends for prescription drug products;
(2) The number of prescription drug products that were subject to Board
review and the results of the review; and
(3) Any recommendations the Board may have on further legislation
needed to make prescription drug products more affordable in the State.
(D) IF THE BOARD SETS A NEW UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT, TO THE EXTENT
PRACTICABLE, THE BOARD SHALL INCLUDE IN THE FIRST REPORT THAT IS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION AFTER THE UPPER PAYMENT
LIMIT HAS BEEN IN EFFECT FOR 1 YEAR INFORMATION ON THE EFFECTS OF THE
UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT, BASED ON AVAILABLE TIMELY DATA, FOR THE FOLLOWING:
(1) PATIENT OUT–OF–POCKET COSTS INCLUDING WHETHER THE
UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT WAS ASSOCIATED WITH INCREASES OR DECREASES IN WHAT
PATIENTS PAY FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCTS;

SENATE BILL 357 7
(2) PATIENT HEALTH INSURANCE PREMIUMS, INCLUDING WHETHER
THE UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT IS ASSOCIATED WITH INCREASES OR DECREASES IN
HEALTH INSURANCE COSTS FOR PATIENTS;
(3) PHARMACIES OPERATING IN THE STATE, INCLUDING THE IMPACT
ON REIMBURSEMENT RATES AND FINANCIAL VIABILITY OF RETAIL AND
INDEPENDENT PHARMACIES;
(4) PATIENT HEALTH INSURANCE FORMULARIES, INCLUDING
WHETHER THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT SUBJECT TO THE UPPER PAYMENT
LIMIT REMAINED ON FORMULARIES;
(5) PROVIDER–ADMINISTERED MEDICATIONS SUBJECT TO THE
UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT, INCLUDING WHETHER PROVIDERS WERE ABLE TO ACQUIRE
THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT SUBJECT TO THE UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT AT A
RATE TO ACCOUNT FOR ACQUISITION COSTS AND WHETHER THERE WAS AN IMPACT
ON PROVIDER REIMBURSEMENT;
(6) PATIENT ACCESS TO THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT
SUBJECT TO THE UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT, WHICH MAY INCLUDE:
(I) WHETHER PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT SHORTAGES OR
OTHER SUPPLY DISRUPTIONS OCCURRED AFTER THE UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT TOOK
EFFECT;
(II) WHETHER FORMULARY PLACEMENT OR PLAN DESIGN
CHANGES MADE THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT SUBJECT TO THE UPPER LIMIT
MORE DIFFICULT FOR PATIENTS TO ACCESS, INCLUDING IF INSURANCE PLANS
PREFERRED A PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT WITHOUT AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT
OVER A PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT SUBJECT TO AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT;
(III) WHETHER THE DISTRIBUTION AND DELIVERY OF
SPECIALTY OR RARE DISEASE MEDICATIONS FROM OUT–OF–STATE PHARMACIES TO
PROVIDERS, PHARMACIES, OR PATIENTS WAS IMPACTED;
(IV) WHETHER PATIENTS IN COMMUNITIES OF COLOR,
PATIENTS WHO ARE WOMEN, PATIENTS WITH A RARE DISEASE, OR PATIENTS IN
RURAL AREAS EXPERIENCED DISPROPORTIONATE ACCESS CHALLENGES; AND
(V) WHETHER COST DIFFERENCES AS A RESULT OF THE UPPER
PAYMENT LIMIT AFFECTED PATIENTS, PHARMACIES, OR PROVIDERS AND, IF THE
COST DIFFERENCE RESULTED IN AN INCREASE IN COSTS, WHO WAS ULTIMATELY
RESPONSIBLE FOR BEARING THE INCREASED COST;

SENATE BILL 357
(7) COVERED ENTITY PROVIDERS PARTICIPATING IN THE 340B DRUG
DISCOUNT PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE IMPACT OF THE UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT ON
THE OPERATIONS OF THE PROVIDERS AND THEIR CONTRACTED PHARMACIES; AND
(8) THE BIOTECHNOLOGY INDUSTRY IN THE STATE, INCLUDING THE
IMPACT ON PHARMACEUTICAL RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT, INVESTMENT, AND
JOB GROWTH.
(E) (1) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST INFORMATION NECESSARY TO
COMPLETE THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS
SECTION FROM AN AFFECTED ENTITY.
(2) THE ENTITY FROM WHICH INFORMATION WAS REQUESTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL MAKE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO
PROVIDE THE REQUESTED INFORMATION.
21–2C–11.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Prescription Drug Affordability Fund.
[(d) (1) The Board shall be established using special or general funds, which
shall be repaid to the State with the funds from the Fund.
(2) If the Board receives funding from the Maryland Health Care
Commission under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Board shall repay the funds to the
Commission from the Fund over a 3–year period beginning June 1, 2021.]
21–2C–13.
(a) If, under § 21–2C–07 of this subtitle, the Board finds that it is in the best
interest of the State to establish a process for setting upper payment limits for prescription
drug products that it determines have led or will lead to an affordability challenge, the
Board, in conjunction with the Stakeholder Council, shall draft a plan of action for
implementing the process [that includes the criteria the Board shall use to set upper
payment limits] IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(b) The criteria for setting upper payment limits shall include consideration of:
(1) The cost of administering the prescription drug product;
(2) The cost of delivering the prescription drug product to consumers; [and]
(3) THE EFFECT THE UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT WILL HAVE ON
PROVIDERS OF 340B DRUGS;

SENATE BILL 357 9
(4) FOR AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT ON A DRUG THAT IS DESIGNATED
AS A DRUG FOR A RARE DISEASE OR CONDITION, THE IMPACT OF THE UPPER
PAYMENT LIMIT ON PATIENTS WITH RARE DISEASES; AND
[(3)] (4) (5) Other relevant administrative costs related to the prescription
drug product.
[(c) The process for setting upper payment limits shall:
(1) Prohibit the application of an upper payment limit for a prescription
drug product that is on the federal Food and Drug Administration prescription drug
shortage list; and
(2) Require the Board to:
(i) Monitor the availability of any prescription drug product for
which it sets an upper payment limit; and
(ii) If there becomes a shortage of the prescription drug product in
the State, reconsider or suspend the upper payment limit.]
(C) (1) IF THE BOARD PREVIOUSLY SET AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT FOR A
DRUG THAT BECOMES A CURRENT SHORTAGE, THE BOARD MAY RECONSIDER THE
PREVIOUSLY SET UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT.
(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT:
(I) ESTABLISH APPLY A NEW UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT FOR TO A
DRUG IN A CURRENT SHORTAGE;
(II) ENFORCE AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT AGAINST PROVIDER
OR PHARMACY REIMBURSEMENT REQUIREMENTS FOR MEDICARE PART C OR PART
D PLANS; OR
(III) COUNT A PHARMACY DISPENSING FEE TOWARD OR
SUBJECT A PHARMACY DISPENSING FEE TO AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT.
(d) (1) If a plan of action is drafted under subsection (a) of this section, the
Board shall submit the plan of action to the Legislative Policy Committee of the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, for its approval.
(2) The Legislative Policy Committee shall have 45 days to approve the
plan of action.

SENATE BILL 357
(3) If the Legislative Policy Committee does not approve the plan of action,
the Board shall submit the plan to the Governor and the Attorney General for approval.
(4) The Governor and the Attorney General shall have 45 days to approve
the plan of action.
(5) The Board may not set upper payment limits unless the plan is
approved, in accordance with this subsection, by:
(i) The Legislative Policy Committee; or
(ii) 1. The Governor; and
2. The Attorney General.
21–2C–14.
[(a) If a plan of action is approved under § 21–2C–13(d) of this subtitle] IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE PLAN OF ACTION APPROVED BY THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY
COMMITTEE ON OCTOBER 22, 2024, the Board may set upper payment limits THROUGH
REGULATIONS for prescription drug products that are:
(1) Purchased or paid for by a unit of State or local government or an
organization on behalf of a unit of State or local government, including:
(i) State or county correctional facilities;
(ii) State hospitals; and
(iii) Health clinics at State institutions of higher education;
(2) Paid for through a health benefit plan on behalf of a unit of State or
local government, including a county, bicounty, or municipal employee health benefit plan;
or
(3) Purchased for or paid for by the Maryland State Medical Assistance
Program.
[(b) The upper payment limits set under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) Be for prescription drug products that have led or will lead to an
affordability challenge; and
(2) Be set in accordance with the criteria established in regulations
adopted by the Board.

SENATE BILL 357 11
(c) (1) The Board shall:
(i) Monitor the availability of any prescription drug product for
which it sets an upper payment limit; and
(ii) If there becomes a shortage of the prescription drug product in
the State, reconsider whether the upper payment limit should be suspended or altered.
(2) An upper payment limit set under subsection (a) of this section may not
be applied to a prescription drug product while the prescription drug product is on the
federal Food and Drug Administration prescription drug shortage list.]
[21–2C–16.
On or before December 1, 2026, the Board, in consultation with the Stakeholder
Council, shall report to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and
Government Operations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on:
(1) The legality, obstacles, and benefits of setting upper payment limits on
all purchases and payor reimbursements of prescription drug products in the State; and
(2) Recommendations regarding whether the General Assembly should
pass legislation to expand the authority of the Board to set upper payment limits to all
purchases and payor reimbursements of prescription drug products in the State.]
21–2C–16.
(A) (1) THE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STAKEHOLDER
COUNCIL, SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER, IN ADDITION TO SETTING UPPER PAYMENT
LIMITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–2C–14 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IT IS IN THE BEST
INTEREST OF THE STATE FOR THE BOARD TO ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR SETTING
UPPER PAYMENT LIMITS FOR ALL PURCHASES AND PAYOR REIMBURSEMENTS OF
PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCTS IN THE STATE THAT THE BOARD DETERMINES
HAVE LED OR WILL LEAD TO AN AFFORDABILITY CHALLENGE.
(2) WHEN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL CONSIDER, IF APPLICABLE:
(I) CONTRACT AND BUDGET DATA PROVIDED TO THE BOARD
THAT DEMONSTRATES SAVINGS TO THE STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AS A
RESULT OF UPPER PAYMENT LIMITS SET IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–2C–14 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;

SENATE BILL 357
(II) SUCCESS OF SETTING UPPER PAYMENT LIMITS IN OTHER
STATES; AND
(III) EXPECTED SAVINGS FROM MEDICARE MAXIMUM FAIR
PRICES SET BY THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES.
(B) (1) IF THE BOARD MAKES AN AFFIRMATIVE DETERMINATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
STAKEHOLDER COUNCIL, SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR SETTING UPPER
PAYMENT LIMITS FOR ALL PURCHASES AND PAYOR REIMBURSEMENTS OF
PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCTS IN THE STATE THAT THE BOARD DETERMINES
HAVE LED OR WILL LEAD TO AN AFFORDABILITY CHALLENGE.
(2) THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) TO THE EXTENT APPROPRIATE, USE THE PLAN OF ACTION
APPROVED UNDER § 21–2C–13(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) OTHERWISE COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS FOR
SETTING UPPER PAYMENT LIMITS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) BEFORE ESTABLISHING AN UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT THAT APPLIES
TO THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, THE BOARD SHALL CONFER
WITH THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM TO APPROVE THE
APPLICATION OF THE UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT BY ASSESSING WHETHER THE
PROPOSED UPPER PAYMENT LIMIT WILL:
(I) CONFLICT WITH THE MEDICAID DRUG REBATES
PROGRAM, THE COVERED OUTPATIENT DRUG RULE (CMS–2345–FC), OR ANY
OTHER FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS AS APPLICABLE; AND
(II) REQUIRE ADDITIONAL FUNDING TO BE ALLOCATED TO THE
MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM BUDGET.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–2C–16.
(C) (1) IF SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE
BOARD ESTABLISHES A PROCESS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE

SENATE BILL 357 13
BOARD SHALL SET UPPER PAYMENT LIMITS FOR ALL PURCHASES AND PAYOR
REIMBURSEMENTS OF PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCTS IN THE STATE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCESS.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO:
(I) PAYOR REIMBURSEMENTS UNDER MEDICARE PART C AND
D PLANS;
(II) PURCHASES UNDER THE FEDERAL 340B DRUG PRICING
PROGRAM; AND
(III) PURCHASES AND PAYOR REIMBURSEMENTS UNDER BY
FEDERAL AGENCIES OR FEDERAL PROGRAMS THAT ARE THE STATE IS PREEMPTED
FROM REGULATING BY FEDERAL LAW INCLUDING:
1. THE DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE;
2. THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS;
3. THE PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICE;
4. THE UNITED STATES COAST GUARD;
5. TRICARE;
6. THE FEDERAL EMPLOYEES HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN;
AND
7. ANY OTHER EXCLUSIVE FEDERAL PROGRAM AS
APPLICABLE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 2 of this Act is contingent on the Prescription Drug Affordability Board
setting upper payment limits on two prescription drugs in accordance with § 21–2C–14 of
the Health – General Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, and each upper payment
limit being in effect for 1 year.
(b) Within 5 days after the conditions described in subsection (a) of this section
are met, the Prescription Drug Affordability Board shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services.
(c) If notice is received by the Department of Legislative Services in accordance
with subsection (b) of this section on or before September 31 September 30, 2030, Section 2

SENATE BILL 357
of this Act shall take effect on the date the notice is received by the Department of
Legislative Services.
(d) If notice is not received by the Department of Legislative Services on or before
December 31 September 30, 2030, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 3 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.